Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.05, is amended to read: 116U.05 EXPLORE MINNESOTAnew text begin ; ESTABLISHMENTnew text end . Explore Minnesota is an office in the executive branch with a director appointed by the governor. The director is under the supervision of the commissioner of employment and economic development and oversees Explore Minnesota Tourism deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end Explore Minnesota for Businessnew text begin , and Explore Minnesota Filmnew text end divisions. The director serves in the unclassified service and must be qualified by experience and training in related fields. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.06, is amended to read: 116U.06 EXPLORE MINNESOTA deleted text begin TOURISMdeleted text end . Explore Minnesota deleted text begin Tourism is a division of Explore Minnesota and exists to supportdeleted text end new text begin supports the growth ofnew text end Minnesota's economy through deleted text begin promotion and facilitation of travel to and within the state of Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin the management of the state's tourism, livability and economic opportunity, outdoor recreation, film, and other statewide promotion efforts as directednew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.15, is amended to read: 116U.15 MISSION. (a) The mission of Explore Minnesota is to deleted text begin promote and facilitate increased travel to and within the state of Minnesota, promote overall livability, and promote workforce and economic opportunity in Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin support the growth of Minnesota's economy through the management of the state's tourism, livability and economic opportunity, outdoor recreation, film, and other statewide promotion efforts as directednew text end . To further the mission of Explore Minnesota, the office is advised by new text begin various advisory new text end councils deleted text begin focused on tourism and talent attraction and business marketingdeleted text end . Its goals are to: (1) expand public and private partnerships through increased interagency efforts and increased tourism and business industry participation; (2) increase productivity through enhanced flexibility and options; and (3) use innovative fiscal and human resource practices to manage the state's resources and operate the office as efficiently as possible. (b) The director shall report to the legislature on the performance of the office's operations and the accomplishment of its goals in the office's biennial budget according to section 16A.10, subdivision 1. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.30, is amended to read: 116U.30 DUTIES OF DIRECTOR. (a) The director shall: (1) publish, disseminate, and distribute informational and promotional materials; (2) promote and encourage the coordination of new text begin Explore new text end Minnesota deleted text begin travel, tourism, overall livability, and workforce and economic opportunitydeleted text end promotion efforts with other state agencies and develop multiagency marketing strategies when appropriate; (3) promote and encourage the expansion and development of deleted text begin international tourism, trade, and Minnesota livability marketingdeleted text end new text begin programs that support the mission of the officenew text end ; (4) advertise and disseminate information about deleted text begin Minnesota travel, tourism, and workforce and economic development opportunitiesdeleted text end new text begin Explore Minnesota and its activities that support the mission of the officenew text end ; (5) deleted text begin aid variousdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end local communities new text begin a reasonable level of support new text end to improve their deleted text begin travel, tourism, and overall livabilitydeleted text end marketing programsnew text begin as they relate to the mission of the officenew text end ; (6) coordinate and implement comprehensive state deleted text begin travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livabilitydeleted text end new text begin mission-drivennew text end marketing programs that take into consideration public and private businesses and attractions; (7) contract, in accordance with section 16C.08, for professional services if the work or services cannot be satisfactorily performed by employees of the agency or by any other state agency; (8) provide local, regional, and statewide organizations with information, deleted text begin technical assistancedeleted text end new text begin educational opportunitiesnew text end , training, and advice on deleted text begin using state tourism and livability information anddeleted text end new text begin promotionalnew text end programsnew text begin related to the office's missionnew text end ; and (9) generally gather, compile, and make available statistical information relating to deleted text begin Minnesota travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, overall livability, and related areas in this statedeleted text end new text begin the office's missionnew text end . The director has the authority to call upon other state agencies for statistical data and results obtained by them and to arrange and compile that statistical information. (b) The director may: (1) apply for, receive, and spend money deleted text begin for travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livability development and marketingdeleted text end new text begin , as it relates to the mission of the office,new text end from other agencies, organizations, and businesses; (2) apply for, accept, and disburse grants and other aids for deleted text begin tourismdeleted text end development and marketing from the federal government and other sources; (3) enter into joint powers or cooperative agreements with agencies of the federal government, local governmental units, regional development commissions, other state agencies, the University of Minnesota and other educational institutions, other states, Canadian provinces, and local, statewide, and regional organizations as necessary to perform the director's duties; (4) enter into interagency agreements and agree to share net revenues with the contributing agencies; (5) make grants; (6) conduct market research and analysis to improve marketing techniques deleted text begin in the area of travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livabilitydeleted text end ; (7) monitor and study trends in the related industries and provide resources and training to address change; (8) annually convene conferences of Minnesota providers for the purposes of exchanging information on tourism development, coordinating marketing activities, and formulating deleted text begin tourism, overall livability, and workforce and economic opportunitydeleted text end new text begin mission-relatednew text end promotion development strategies; and (9) enter into promotion contracts or other agreements with private persons and public entities, including agreements to establish and maintain offices and other types of representation in foreign countries to promote international travel and to implement this chapter. (c) Contracts for goods and deleted text begin nonprofessionaldeleted text end new text begin services and professionalnew text end technical services made under paragraph (b), clauses (3) and (9), are not subject to the provisions of sections 16C.03, subdivision 3, and 16C.06 concerning competitive bidding and section 16C.055 concerning barter arrangements. new text begin Professional technical service new text end contracts new text begin that promote Minnesota as a tourism travel destination or a talent attraction new text end may be negotiated and are not subject to the provisions of chapter 16C relating to competitive bidding. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116U.35, is amended to read: 116U.35 PROMOTIONAL EXPENSES. To promote deleted text begin travel, tourism, workforce and economic development, and overall livability of the statedeleted text end new text begin programs that align with Explore Minnesota's missionnew text end , the director may expend money appropriated by the legislature for these purposes in the same manner as private persons, firms, corporations, and associations make expenditures for these purposes. Policies on promotional expenses must be approved by the commissioner of administration. A policy for expenditures on food, lodging, and travel must be approved by the commissioner of management and budget. No money may be expended for the appearance in radio or television broadcasts by an elected public official.